Georgia, session 2025_26, HB893.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended by
replacing "charter system" and "charter systems" with "performance contract system" and
"performance contract systems", respectively, wherever the former terms appear in:
(1) Code Section 20-1-11, relating to advocating for divisive concepts, prohibition on
discrimination, practice of tolerance and mutual respect encouraged, complaint resolution
policies, inspection of records, and waivers prohibited;
(2) Code Section 20-2-59, relating to rules relative to local boards of education and
regulation of face masks;
H. B. 893
- 1 -

LC 49 2356
(3) Code Section 20-2-84.4, relating to accountability, flexibility, and consequences
components of contract;
(4) Code Section 20-2-84.5, relating to applicability of increased flexibility for local
school systems to charter systems;
(5) Code Section 20-2-153.1, relating to Georgia Early Literacy, uniform grade
appropriate metrics to measure literacy, universal reading screeners, high-quality
instructional materials aligned with the science of reading, support for literacy
instruction, and reading intervention plans;
(6) Code Section 20-2-165.1, relating to charter system earnings for each full-time
equivalent student and use of funds;
(7) Code Section 20-2-166, relating to state funds, calculation, allotment, and distribution
relative to financing under the "Quality Basic Education Act";
(8) Code Section 20-2-167.2, relating to virtual instruction through virtual schools and
no waivers;
(9) Code Section 20-2-210, relating to annual performance evaluation and on-time
graduation rate relative to conditions of employment under the "Quality Basic Education
Act";
(10) Code Section 20-2-281, relating to student assessments;
(11) Code Section 20-2-286, relating to innovative assessment pilot program, procedure,
and reporting relative to effectiveness of education programs under the "Quality Basic
Education Act";
(12) Code Section 20-2-324, relating to internet acceptable-use policies required in all
public schools, minimum policy requirements, policy enforcement, technology protection
measures required, policy compliance review, approval, and enforcement by State Board
of Education, and waivers prohibited;
(13) Code Section 20-2-326, relating to definitions relative to Building Resourceful
Individuals to Develop Georgia's Economy;
H. B. 893
- 2 -

LC 49 2356
(14) Code Section 20-2-779.2, relating to enforcement of face mask wearing requirement
prohibited;
(15) Code Section 20-2-786, the "Parents' Bill of Rights";
(16) Code Section 20-2-2062, relating to definitions relative to the "Charter Schools Act
of 1998";
(17) Code Section 20-2-2063, relating to charter petitions relative to the "Charter Schools
Act of 1998";
(18) Code Section 2063.1, relating to Charter Advisory Committee established,
members, and duties;
(19) Code Section 20-2-2063.2, relating to charter systems;
(20) Code Section 20-2-2064, relating approval or denial of a petition relative to the
"Charter Schools Act of 1998";
(21) Code Section 20-2-2065, relating to waiver of provisions of this title, requirements
for operating, and control and management relative to the "Charter Schools Act of 1998";
(22) Code Section 20-2-2066, relating to admission, enrollment, and withdrawal of
students relative to the "Charter Schools Act of 1998";
(23) Code Section 20-2-2067.1, relating to amendment of terms of charter for charter
school, initial term of charter, and annual report relative to the "Charter Schools Act of
1998";
(24) Code Section 20-2-2068, relating to termination of a charter relative to the "Charter
Schools Act of 1998";
(25) Code Section 20-2-2068.1, relating to charter school funding relative to the "Charter
Schools Act of 1998";
(26) Code Section 20-2-2069, relating to Office of Charter School Compliance and
Office of District Flexibility;
(27) Code Section 20-2-2077, relating to enforcement of face mask wearing requirement
prohibited in charter schools relative to the "Charter Schools Act of 1998";
H. B. 893
- 3 -

LC 49 2356
(28) Code Section 20-4-37, relating to Office of College and Career Transitions and
powers and duties; and
(29) Code Section 20-14-45, relating to turnaround eligible schools defined,
identification, and role of local boards of education.
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 893
- 4 -